Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2108
Branch closing or disposal; act; how construed.

Nothing in the Interstate Branching By Merger Act of 1997 shall prevent the resulting bank in an interstate merger transaction from closing or disposing of any branches acquired in the transaction in accordance with state law subject to applicable federal law regarding branch closures.

Laws 1997, LB 351, § 8.